src/Korektor/sr-Latn.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1868 Y 27
SFX 1868 teti teti
SFX 1868 teti tem
SFX 1868 teti tiš
SFX 1868 teti ti
SFX 1868 teti timo
SFX 1868 teti tite
SFX 1868 teti te
SFX 1868 teti tio
SFX 1868 teti tila
SFX 1868 teti tilo
SFX 1868 teti tili
SFX 1868 teti tile
SFX 1868 teti tiću
SFX 1868 teti tićeš
SFX 1868 teti tiće
SFX 1868 teti tićemo
SFX 1868 teti tićete
SFX 1868 teti tiće
SFX 1868 teti ti
SFX 1868 teti timo
SFX 1868 teti tite
SFX 1868 teti teh
SFX 1868 teti teše
SFX 1868 teti tesmo
SFX 1868 teti teste
SFX 1868 teti ćahu
SFX 1868 teti teći

SFX 1869 Y 28
SFX 1869 teti teti
SFX 1869 teti oću
SFX 1869 teti oćeš
SFX 1869 teti oće
SFX 1869 teti oćemo
SFX 1869 teti oćete
SFX 1869 teti oće
SFX 1869 teti teo
SFX 1869 teti tela
SFX 1869 teti telo
SFX 1869 teti teli
SFX 1869 teti tele
SFX 1869 teti teću
SFX 1869 teti tećeš
SFX 1869 teti teće
SFX 1869 teti tećemo
SFX 1869 teti tećete
SFX 1869 teti teće
SFX 1869 teti tej
SFX 1869 teti tejmo
SFX 1869 teti tejte
SFX 1869 teti tedoh
SFX 1869 teti tede
SFX 1869 teti tedosmo
SFX 1869 teti tedoste
SFX 1869 teti tedoše
SFX 1869 teti oteći
SFX 1869 teti tevši

SFX 1870 Y 27
SFX 1870 tjeti tjeti
SFX 1870 tjeti oću
SFX 1870 tjeti oćeš
SFX 1870 tjeti oće
SFX 1870 tjeti oćemo
SFX 1870 tjeti oćete
SFX 1870 tjeti oće
SFX 1870 tjeti tio
SFX 1870 tjeti tjela
SFX 1870 tjeti tjelo
SFX 1870 tjeti tjeli
SFX 1870 tjeti tjele
SFX 1870 tjeti tjeću
SFX 1870 tjeti tjećeš
SFX 1870 tjeti tjeće
SFX 1870 tjeti tjećemo
SFX 1870 tjeti tjećete
SFX 1870 tjeti tjeće
SFX 1870 tjeti tjedni
SFX 1870 tjeti tjednimo
SFX 1870 tjeti tjednite
SFX 1870 tjeti tjedoh
SFX 1870 tjeti tjedoše
SFX 1870 tjeti tjedosmo
SFX 1870 tjeti tjedoste
SFX 1870 tjeti oćahu
SFX 1870 tjeti tjeći

SFX 1871 Y 28
SFX 1871 asti asti
SFX 1871 asti atem
SFX 1871 asti ateš
SFX 1871 asti ate
SFX 1871 asti atemo
SFX 1871 asti atete
SFX 1871 asti atu
SFX 1871 asti ao
SFX 1871 asti ala
SFX 1871 asti alo
SFX 1871 asti ali
SFX 1871 asti ale
SFX 1871 asti ašću
SFX 1871 asti ašćeš
SFX 1871 asti ašće
SFX 1871 asti ašćemo
SFX 1871 asti ašćete
SFX 1871 asti ašće
SFX 1871 asti ati
SFX 1871 asti atimo
SFX 1871 asti atite
SFX 1871 asti ah
SFX 1871 asti ate
SFX 1871 asti aše
SFX 1871 asti asmo
SFX 1871 asti aste
SFX 1871 asti ahu
SFX 1871 asti ući

SFX 1872 Y 27
SFX 1872 eti eti
SFX 1872 eti em
SFX 1872 eti eš
SFX 1872 eti e
SFX 1872 eti emo
SFX 1872 eti ete
SFX 1872 eti e
SFX 1872 eti eo
SFX 1872 eti ela
SFX 1872 eti elo
SFX 1872 eti eli
SFX 1872 eti ele
SFX 1872 eti eću
SFX 1872 eti ećeš
SFX 1872 eti eće
SFX 1872 eti ećemo
SFX 1872 eti ećete
SFX 1872 eti eće
SFX 1872 eti i
SFX 1872 eti imo
SFX 1872 eti ite
SFX 1872 eti eh
SFX 1872 eti eše
SFX 1872 eti esmo
SFX 1872 eti este
SFX 1872 eti ahu
SFX 1872 eti eći

SFX 1873 Y 28
SFX 1873 sti sti
SFX 1873 sti em
SFX 1873 sti eš
SFX 1873 sti e
SFX 1873 sti emo
SFX 1873 sti ete
SFX 1873 sti u
SFX 1873 sti ao
SFX 1873 sti la
SFX 1873 sti lo
SFX 1873 sti li
SFX 1873 sti le
SFX 1873 sti eću
SFX 1873 sti ećeš
SFX 1873 sti eće
SFX 1873 sti ećemo
SFX 1873 sti ećete
SFX 1873 sti eće
SFX 1873 sti i
SFX 1873 sti imo
SFX 1873 sti ite
SFX 1873 sti eh
SFX 1873 sti e
SFX 1873 sti eše
SFX 1873 sti esmo
SFX 1873 sti este
SFX 1873 sti ahu
SFX 1873 sti eći

SFX 1874 Y 29
SFX 1874 uti uti
SFX 1874 uti ujem
SFX 1874 uti uješ
SFX 1874 uti uje
SFX 1874 uti ujemo
SFX 1874 uti ujete
SFX 1874 uti uju
SFX 1874 uti uo
SFX 1874 uti ula
SFX 1874 uti ulo
SFX 1874 uti uli
SFX 1874 uti ule
SFX 1874 uti uću
SFX 1874 uti ućeš
SFX 1874 uti uće
SFX 1874 uti ućemo
SFX 1874 uti ućete
SFX 1874 uti uće
SFX 1874 uti uj
SFX 1874 uti ujmo
SFX 1874 uti ujte
SFX 1874 uti uh
SFX 1874 uti u
SFX 1874 uti uše
SFX 1874 uti usmo
SFX 1874 uti uste
SFX 1874 uti uhu
SFX 1874 uti ući
SFX 1874 uti uvši

SFX 1875 Y 27
SFX 1875 ati ati
SFX 1875 ati im
SFX 1875 ati iš
SFX 1875 ati i
SFX 1875 ati imo
SFX 1875 ati ite
SFX 1875 ati a
SFX 1875 ati ao
SFX 1875 ati ala
SFX 1875 ati alo
SFX 1875 ati ali
SFX 1875 ati ale
SFX 1875 ati aću
SFX 1875 ati aćeš
SFX 1875 ati aće
SFX 1875 ati aćemo
SFX 1875 ati aćete
SFX 1875 ati aće
SFX 1875 ati i
SFX 1875 ati imo
SFX 1875 ati ite
SFX 1875 ati ah
SFX 1875 ati aše
SFX 1875 ati asmo
SFX 1875 ati aste
SFX 1875 ati ahu
SFX 1875 ati eći

SFX 1876 Y 10
SFX 1876 em em
SFX 1876 em eš
SFX 1876 em e
SFX 1876 em emo
SFX 1876 em ete
SFX 1876 em u
SFX 1876 em i
SFX 1876 em imo
SFX 1876 em ite
SFX 1876 em ući

SFX 1877 Y 13
SFX 1877 i i
SFX 1877 i og
SFX 1877 i om
SFX 1877 i ome
SFX 1877 i oga
SFX 1877 i ih
SFX 1877 i im
SFX 1877 i ima
SFX 1877 i a
SFX 1877 i e
SFX 1877 i oj
SFX 1877 i u
SFX 1877 i o

SFX 1878 Y 13
SFX 1878 i i
SFX 1878 i eg
SFX 1878 i em
SFX 1878 i emu
SFX 1878 i ega
SFX 1878 i ih
SFX 1878 i im
SFX 1878 i ima
SFX 1878 i a
SFX 1878 i e
SFX 1878 i oj
SFX 1878 i u
SFX 1878 i om

SFX 1879 Y 5
SFX 1879 a a
SFX 1879 a e
SFX 1879 a i
SFX 1879 a u
SFX 1879 a om

SFX 1880 Y 9
SFX 1880 i i
SFX 1880 i ih
SFX 1880 i im
SFX 1880 i ima
SFX 1880 i a
SFX 1880 i e
SFX 1880 i oj
SFX 1880 i u
SFX 1880 i o

SFX 1881 Y 5
SFX 1881 tak tak
SFX 1881 tak ci
SFX 1881 tak taka
SFX 1881 tak cima
SFX 1881 tak tke

SFX 1882 Y 13
SFX 1882 k ka
SFX 1882 k ke
SFX 1882 k ki
SFX 1882 k kim
SFX 1882 k kima
SFX 1882 k kih
SFX 1882 k ko
SFX 1882 k kog
SFX 1882 k koga
SFX 1882 k koj
SFX 1882 k kom
SFX 1882 k kome
SFX 1882 k ku

SFX 1883 Y 13
SFX 1883 š ša
SFX 1883 š še
SFX 1883 š šeg
SFX 1883 š šega
SFX 1883 š šem
SFX 1883 š šemu
SFX 1883 š ši
SFX 1883 š šim
SFX 1883 š šima
SFX 1883 š ših
SFX 1883 š šoj
SFX 1883 š šom
SFX 1883 š šu

SFX 1884 Y 4
SFX 1884 i i
SFX 1884 i as
SFX 1884 i am
SFX 1884 i ama

SFX 1885 Y 7
SFX 1885 o o
SFX 1885 o og
SFX 1885 o oga
SFX 1885 o om
SFX 1885 o ome
SFX 1885 o im
SFX 1885 o ime

SFX 1886 Y 5
SFX 1886 eg ega
SFX 1886 eg em
SFX 1886 eg emu
SFX 1886 eg im
SFX 1886 eg ime

SFX 1887 Y 2
SFX 1887 a a
SFX 1887 a o

SFX 1888 Y 6
SFX 1888 ene ene
SFX 1888 ene e
SFX 1888 ene eni
SFX 1888 ene i
SFX 1888 ene nom
SFX 1888 ene nome

SFX 1889 Y 18
SFX 1889 j j
SFX 1889 j ja
SFX 1889 j je
SFX 1889 j jeg
SFX 1889 j jega
SFX 1889 j g
SFX 1889 j ga
SFX 1889 j jem
SFX 1889 j jemu
SFX 1889 j m
SFX 1889 j me
SFX 1889 j ji
SFX 1889 j jim
SFX 1889 j jima
SFX 1889 j jih
SFX 1889 j joj
SFX 1889 j jom
SFX 1889 j ju

SFX 1890 Y 3
SFX 1890 s s
SFX 1890 s m
SFX 1890 s ma

SFX 1891 Y 14
SFX 1891 an an
SFX 1891 an na
SFX 1891 an ne
SFX 1891 an ni
SFX 1891 an nim
SFX 1891 an nima
SFX 1891 an nih
SFX 1891 an no
SFX 1891 an nog
SFX 1891 an noga
SFX 1891 an noj
SFX 1891 an nom
SFX 1891 an nome
SFX 1891 an nu

SFX 1892 Y 5
SFX 1892 e e
SFX 1892 e oj
SFX 1892 e u
SFX 1892 e om
SFX 1892 e ome

SFX 1893 Y 4
SFX 1893 ega ega
SFX 1893 ega emu
SFX 1893 ega im
SFX 1893 ega ime

SFX 1894 Y 13
SFX 1894 v va
SFX 1894 v ve
SFX 1894 v vi
SFX 1894 v vim
SFX 1894 v vima
SFX 1894 v vih
SFX 1894 v vo
SFX 1894 v vog
SFX 1894 v voga
SFX 1894 v voj
SFX 1894 v vom
SFX 1894 v vome
SFX 1894 v vu

SFX 1895 Y 13
SFX 1895 n na
SFX 1895 n ne
SFX 1895 n ni
SFX 1895 n nim
SFX 1895 n nima
SFX 1895 n nih
SFX 1895 n no
SFX 1895 n nog
SFX 1895 n noga
SFX 1895 n noj
SFX 1895 n nom
SFX 1895 n nome
SFX 1895 n nu

SFX 1896 Y 2
SFX 1896 h h
SFX 1896 h ma

SFX 1897 Y 15
SFX 1897 aj a
SFX 1897 aj aj
SFX 1897 aj e
SFX 1897 aj i
SFX 1897 aj im
SFX 1897 aj ima
SFX 1897 aj ime
SFX 1897 aj ih
SFX 1897 aj o
SFX 1897 aj og
SFX 1897 aj oga
SFX 1897 aj oj
SFX 1897 aj om
SFX 1897 aj ome
SFX 1897 aj u

SFX 1898 Y 15
SFX 1898 av av
SFX 1898 av va
SFX 1898 av ve
SFX 1898 av vi
SFX 1898 av vim
SFX 1898 av vime
SFX 1898 av vima
SFX 1898 av vih
SFX 1898 av vo
SFX 1898 av vog
SFX 1898 av voga
SFX 1898 av voj
SFX 1898 av vom
SFX 1898 av vome
SFX 1898 av vu

SFX 1899 Y 5
SFX 1899 e e
SFX 1899 e eg
SFX 1899 e ega
SFX 1899 e emu
SFX 1899 e im

SFX 1900 Y 5
SFX 1900 ebe ebe
SFX 1900 ebe e
SFX 1900 ebe ebi
SFX 1900 ebe i
SFX 1900 ebe obom

SFX 1901 Y 5
SFX 1901 i i
SFX 1901 i e
SFX 1901 i ebe
SFX 1901 i ebi
SFX 1901 i obom

PFX 19 Y 1
PFX 19 0 ne

PFX 988 Y 1
PFX 988 0 naj
