src/Korektor/sr-Latn.dic
analitički/744,19
aromatični/987,988
baždarenje/6,19
bezizgledni/987,988
bespokojni/987,988
bludni/987,988
bogoslužben/746,19
buljav/990,988
vaskolik/1882
vaš/1883
vezanje/6,19
vi/1884
vitalni/987,988
vlasnik/5,19
gdeko/1885
gdečeg/1886
gdešta/1887
gdjeko/1885
gdječeg/1886
gdješta/1887
glamurozni/987,988
gledanost/9,19
grozni/987,988
dvadesetdeveti/1877
dvadeseti/1877
dvadesetpeti/1877
dvadesetsedmi/1877
dvadesettreći/1878
dvadesetšesti/1877
dvestahiljaditi/1877
dvestotiniti/1877
dvijehiljaditi/1877
dvjestoti/1877
dvojica/1879
dvoličnost/9,19
devedesetdeveti/1877
devedeseti/1877
devedesetpeti/1877
devedesetsedmi/1877
devedesettreći/1878
devedesetšesti/1877
devetnaesti/1877
devetori/1880
devetorica/1879
devetstoti/1877
desetak/1881
desetomilioniti/1877
desetori/1880
desetorica/1879
desethiljaditi/1877
decentralizovan/989,988
dešavanje/6,19
dobivanje/6,19
domeren/746,19
dohvat/18,19
dražestan/992,988
ekskluzivni/745,19
ekskluzivni/987,988
eufemistički/744,19
živahni/987,988
zagrižen/746,19
zaljubljivanje/6,19
zaplašen/989,988
zapostavljanje/6,19
zahvatljiv/748,19
zilioniti/1877
iglast/991,988
igrač/50,19
izvršavanje/6,19
izminiran/746,19
iko/1885
imenovan/746,19
impresioniran/989,988
interaktivnost/9,19
islikan/746,19
ispucao/1003,988
istorijski/744,19
ičeg/1886
išta/1887
jeđenje/6,19
kvadrilioniti/1877
kvantitativni/745,19
ko/1885
kojeko/1885
koječeg/1886
koješta/1887
koketni/987,988
komplementarnost/9,19
kontroverzni/745,19
kuždrav/990,988
liberalnost/9,19
marginalizovan/989,988
mene/1888
mikrohirurški/744,19
milijarditi/1877
moj/1889
nabijen/989,988
nadjeven/746,19
nas/1890
naturen/746,19
natušten/989,988
neverni/987,988
nedopadljiv/990,988
nezamašćen/989,988
neizgrađen/989,988
neisplativ/990,988
neko/1885
nekorozivni/987,988
nemučni/987,988
neobuzet/991,988
neosmehnut/991,988
nepodudaran/989,988
nepravoverni/987,988
neprogonjen/989,988
nerazobličen/989,988
nesamodovoljni/987,988
nespasonosni/987,988
neubitačni/987,988
neupotrebljavan/989,988
nečeg/1886
nečitljiv/990,988
nešta/1887
nijedan/1891
niko/1885
ničeg/1886
ništa/1887
nje/1892
njega/1893
njegov/1894
njezin/1895
njen/1895
njin/1895
njih/1896
njihov/1894
obadvojica/1879
obojica/1879
obuhvativost/9,19
ovaj/1897
održiv/990,988
označen/746,19
onaj/1897
ophodnost/9,19
osamdesetdeveti/1877
osamdeseti/1877
osamdesetpeti/1877
osamdesetsedmi/1877
osamdesettreći/1878
osamdesetšesti/1877
osamstoti/1877
osmomilioniti/1877
osmori/1880
osmorica/1879
ospičav/990,988
otpravljen/746,19
pedesetdrugi/1877
pedesetosmi/1877
pedesetpeti/1877
pedesetsedmi/1877
pedesettreći/1878
pedesetšesti/1877
petnaesti/1877
petori/1880
petorica/1879
petstoti/1877
pitomost/9,19
plaćen/989,988
pogdeko/1885
pogdečeg/1886
pogdešta/1887
pogdjeko/1885
pođubren/746,19
poletni/987,988
poneko/1885
ponečeg/1886
ponešta/1887
popularnost/9,19
pošumljen/989,988
pravedni/745,19
prepisan/746,19
priljepčiv/990,988
primećen/746,19
prokrčen/746,19
prostrt/991,988
pušenje/6,19
razočaran/989,988
razrušen/746,19
redukujući/749,19
repat/991,988
sav/1898
savršenost/9,19
svako/1885
svačeg/1886
svašta/1887
sve/1899
svetlucav/990,988
svoj/1889
sebe/1900
sedamdesetdeveti/1877
sedamdeseti/1877
sedamdesetpeti/1877
sedamdesetsedmi/1877
sedamdesettreći/1878
sedamdesetšesti/1877
sedamstoti/1877
sedmomilioniti/1877
sedmori/1880
sedmorica/1879
senčen/746,19
slojevit/991,988
smislenost/9,19
stasan/746,19
stvarni/987,988
stoti/1877
stohiljaditi/1877
taj/1897
tvoj/1889
tematizovan/746,19
tesni/994,988
ti/1901
treći/1878
tridesetdrugi/1877
tridesetosmi/1877
tridesettreći/1878
tridesetčetvrti/1877
trinaesti/1877
trihiljaditi/1877
trojica/1879
uvjerljivost/9,19
uglancan/989,988
ulučen/746,19
upleten/989,988
uremični/745,19
familijarni/745,19
fleksibilni/987,988
hiteti/1868
hteti/1869
htjeti/1870
cvasti/1871
cvateti/1872
cvetnica/25,19
crpsti/1873
čeg/1886
četvori/1880
četvorica/1879
četvrti/1877
četrdeseti/1877
četrdesetsedmi/1877
četrdesettreći/1878
čudni/987,988
čuti/1874
džedžati/1875
šaljem/1876
šezdesetdeveti/1877
šezdesetpeti/1877
šezdesettreći/1878
šezdesetšesti/1877
šesti/1877
šestori/1880
šestorica/1879
šeststoti/1877
šta/1887
štočeg/1886
štošta/1887
